Utah statutes.
63G-2-804.   Violation of provision of chapter -- Penalties for intentional
mutilation or destruction -- Disciplinary action.
A governmental entity may take disciplinary action which may include
suspension or discharge against any employee of the governmental entity who
intentionally violates any provision of this chapter or Subsection
63A-12-105(3).
